New York, session 2025-2026, S3267.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The county of Monroe is hereby authorized to establish and 2 implement a two-year universal basic income pilot program. 3 § 2. Such pilot program shall include 1000 participants chosen random- 4 ly from applicants residing in the county. An applicant is eligible for 5 participation in the program if the applicant is part of a household 6 with at least one child under the age of eighteen at the time of appli- 7 cation. Participants shall agree to fully participate in the study and 8 analysis of the pilot program which shall be administered by an academic 9 research partner. Participants shall receive $500 per month in addi- 10 tional income for the duration of the program. Any monies received by 11 participants as a result of such program shall not be included in deter- 12 mining eligibility for any state assistance program. 13 § 3. Such pilot program shall be funded with (a) any state funds 14 appropriated for such program and (b) any other source of funds secured 15 by the county of Monroe for such program, including but not limited to, 16 funding provided by any not-for-profit corporation. 17 § 4. No later than one year after the conclusion of the pilot 18 program, the county executive, in coordination with the chief financial 19 officer of the county, shall prepare and submit a report to the gover- 20 nor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker of the 21 assembly on the results and findings of the program. Such report shall 22 include, but not be limited to, the following: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00489-01-5 S. 3267 2 1 a. information on the effects of the additional income on the health, 2 stress levels, and mental health of each participant and their house- 3 hold; 4 b. information on the effects of the additional income on the income 5 level of each participant, including the alleviation of poverty for any 6 participant experiencing poverty; 7 c. information regarding changes in employment or employment opportu- 8 nities as a result of the additional income for each participant and 9 their household; 10 d. socio-demographic information, including but not limited to the 11 age, race, ethnicity, education level, family composition, community of 12 residence, housing costs, income level, and government benefits 13 received, of each participant and their household; 14 e. data on how the additional income from the program was allocated; 15 and 16 f. recommendations on implementing future universal income pilot 17 programs, including a statewide program. 18 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 19 deemed repealed two years after such date.